Hawaii statutes.
[§173A-4.5] Appraisal
of land. (a) Notwithstanding section 171-30, the appraisal of land having
value as a resource to the State and acquired by the State under this chapter
may be performed as follows:

(1) The board may review,
approve, and accept any existing appraisal prepared on behalf of a nonprofit
organization if:

(A) The appraisal
was completed within one year before the decision by the board to approve the
acquisition of land; and

(B) The board
finds that the appraisal was performed according to applicable and accepted
professional standards for land appraisal; or

(2) The board may contract
for an independent appraisal from no more than three disinterested appraisers
who shall follow applicable and accepted professional standards for land appraisal.

The board shall submit
the appraisal to the attorney general for review and approval before it
acquires the land having value as a resource to the State.

(b) No land shall
be purchased for a sum greater than the highest value fixed by any appraisal
accepted or performed under subsection (a); provided that this limitation shall
not apply to any acquisition that is made by condemnation.

(c) After the land
having value as a resource to the State has been acquired or the State abandons
the acquisition, the appraisal reports shall be made available for inspection
and copying by the public.

(d) Anything
contained in this section notwithstanding, no appraisal shall be required under
this section in the event that any interest in land having value as a resource
to the State is donated to the State. [L 2007, c 158, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next